Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB559.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Artificial intelligence system" has the same meaning as in KRS 42.722;
(2) "Contextual data" means any information provided by a user to an artificial
intelligence system and any context associated with the user’s interactions with
the artificial intelligence system, including prompts, conversational histories,
files, preferences, and metadata. "Contextual data" does not include a model
operator’s trade secrets;
(3) "Model operator" means the natural or legal person that deploys an artificial
intelligence system and retains control over how the system is offered to or
interacts with end users, but does not include a person or entity that solely
interacts with artificial intelligence systems through application programming
interfaces, licensed services, prompting, or fine tuning;
(4) "Open protocol" means a publicly available set of rules that:
(a) Enables export of social graph or contextual data to other social media
services or model operators; and
(b) Is free from licensing fees and patent restrictions;
(5) "Personal data" has the same meaning as in KRS 367.3611 and also includes a
user's social graph;
(6) (a) "Social graph" means data that represents a user's connections and
interactions within a social media service. Social graph includes:
1. The user's social connections with other users;
2. Content created by the user;
3. The user's responses to other users' content, including comments,
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 353
reactions, mentions, reposts, shares, and other engagements;
4. Metadata associated with the items described in subparagraphs 1. to 3.
of this paragraph; and
5. Relational references sufficient to maintain the associations among
data elements described in subparagraphs 1. to 3. of this paragraph;
(7) "Social media company" means an entity that owns or operates a social media
service;
(8) (a) "Social media service" means a public website or application that:
1. Displays content that is primarily generated by users and not by the
social media company;
2. Permits an individual to register as a user and create a profile that is
made visible to the general public or a set of other users defined by the
account holder;
3. Allows users to interact socially with each other within the website or
application;
4. Makes available to each user a list or lists of other users with whom
the user shares a connection within the website or application; and
5. Allows users to post content viewable by other users.
(b) Social media service does not include:
1. Email;
2. Cloud storage; or
3. Document viewing, sharing, or collaboration services; and
(9) "User" means an individual located in the Commonwealth who accesses or uses
a social media service.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a user requests a copy of the user's personal data under KRS 367.3615(2)(d), a
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 353
social media company or model operator shall provide the personal data,
including the user's social graph and contextual data, in a format that:
(a) Is portable, to the extent technically feasible;
(b) Is readily usable, to the extent practicable; and
(c) Allows the user to transmit the data to another social media company or
model operator without impediment if the social media company or model
operator processes the data by automated means.
(2) A social media company or model operator shall delete a user's social graph and
contextual data if a consumer requests, pursuant to KRS 367.3615(2)(c), that the
social media service or model operator delete their personal data about the user.
(3) A social media company or model operator shall fulfill a request from a user to
exercise the user's data rights under this section within five (5) business days.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A social media company shall implement a transparent, third-party accessible
interoperability interface or interfaces that allow users to choose to:
(a) Share a common set of the user's personal data or a user-selected part of
the user's personal data between the social media services designated by the
user; and
(b) Enable third parties to access personal data created by the user and to be
notified when new or updated personal data is available, with the user's
permission.
(2) A model operator shall implement a third-party accessible interoperability
interface to allow users to share their contextual data directly with other artificial
intelligence systems they designate and enable those artificial intelligence systems
to be notified when new or updated data is available.
(3) A social media company or model operator shall reasonably secure all personal
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 353
data obtained through an interoperability interface.
(4) To achieve interoperability under subsection (1) of this section, a social media
company or model operator shall:
(a) Utilize an open protocol;
(b) Facilitate and maintain interoperability and continuous, real-time data
sharing with other social media services or artificial intelligence systems
through an interoperability interface, based on reasonable terms that do not
discriminate between social media services or artificial intelligence systems;
(c) Establish reasonable and proportionate thresholds related to the frequency,
nature, and volume of requests, beyond which the social media company or
model operator may assess a reasonable fee for such access; and
(d) Disclose to other social media companies or model operators complete,
accurate, and regularly updated documentation describing access to the
interoperability interface required under this section.
(5) A social media company, model operator, or third party shall safeguard the
privacy and security of a user's personal data obtained from other social media
services or artificial intelligence systems through the interoperability interface in
accordance with the social media company's, model operator's, or third party's
privacy notice and administrative, technical, and physical data security practices.
(6) A social media company, model operator, or third party shall not share or receive
a user's personal data through the interoperability interface except with the
user's consent.
(7) A social media company or model operator shall adopt an accessible, prominent,
and persistent method for users to give consent for data sharing with other social
media services, artificial intelligence systems, or third parties through the
interoperability interface.
(8) A social media company is not required to:
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 353
(a) Provide access to:
1. Inferences, analyses, or derived data that the social media company
has generated internally about a user; or
2. Proprietary algorithms, ranking systems, or other internal operating
mechanisms;
(b) Transmit personal data:
1. That is stored or structured in a proprietary format;
2. For which no open, industry-standard format is reasonably available;
and
3. That would disclose information as described in subsection (7) of this
section; or
(c) Display or otherwise use data received from another social media company
or model operator.
(9) A business that uses an artificial intelligence system provided by a model operator
to provide applications or services to a user shall promptly transmit a user's
request to the model operator with sufficient information for the model operator
to execute the request and communicate about the request with the user.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Attorney General, in consultation with the Consumers' Advisory Council,
may identify open protocols that the Attorney General has determined, after an
assessment, meet the requirements of Section 3 of this Act.
(2) If a social media company or model operator uses an open protocol identified by
the Attorney General under subsection (1) of this section, the social media
company or model operator shall be entitled to a rebuttable presumption of
providing access on reasonable terms that do not discriminate between social
media services or artificial intelligence systems.
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 353
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to enforce violations of
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act. The Attorney General may enforce Sections 1 to 6 of
this Act by bringing an action in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or
on behalf of persons residing in this Commonwealth. The Attorney General shall
have all powers and duties granted to the Attorney General under KRS Chapter
15 to investigate and prosecute any violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act. The
Attorney General may demand any information, documentary material, or
physical evidence from any social media company, model operator, or third party
believed to be engaged in, or about to engage in, any violation of Sections 1 to 6
of this Act.
(2) Prior to initiating any action for violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, the
Attorney General shall provide a social media company, model operator, or third
party thirty (30) days' written notice identifying the specific provisions of Sections
1 to 6 of this Act that the Attorney General alleges have been or are being
violated. If within the thirty (30) day period the social media company, model
operator, or third party cures the noticed violation and provides the Attorney
General an express written statement that the alleged violations have been cured
and that no further violations shall occur, no action for damages under
subsection (3) of this section shall be initiated against the social media company,
model operator, or third party.
(3) If a social media company, model operator, or third party continues to violate
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act following the cure period in subsection (2) of this
section, or breaches an express written statement provided to the Attorney
General under subsection (2) of this section, the Attorney General may initiate an
action and seek damages for up to seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500)
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 353
for each continued violation under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(4) Nothing in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act or any other law, regulation, or the
equivalent shall be construed as providing the basis for, or giving rise to, a
private right of action for any violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(5) The Attorney General may recover reasonable expenses incurred in investigating
and preparing the case, court costs, attorney's fees, and any other relief ordered
by the court for any action initiated under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the digital choice fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received from
all civil penalties collected pursuant to Sections 1 to 6 of this Act. Interest earned
on moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Office of the Attorney General.
(3) Amounts deposited into the fund shall be used by the Office of the Attorney
General to enforce Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of the
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
Section 7. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Section 8. This Act may be cited as the Kentucky Digital Choice Act.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/3/2026 2:57 PM Jacketed